Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1113
Moderate sedation, defined.

Moderate sedation means a drug-induced depression of consciousness during which (1) a patient responds purposefully to verbal commands, either alone or accompanied by light tactile stimulation, (2) no intervention is required to maintain a patent airway and spontaneous ventilation is adequate, and (3) cardiovascular function is usually maintained.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 446;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 6.